Hawaii statutes.
§269-107 Net electricity consumers. At
the end of each monthly billing period, where the electricity supplied during
the period by the electric utility exceeds:

(1) The
electricity generated by the eligible customer-generator during that same
period; and

(2) Any
unused credits for excess electricity from the eligible customer-generator
carried over from prior months since the last twelve-month reconciliation
period,

the eligible customer-generator is a net electricity
consumer and the electric utility shall be owed compensation for the eligible
customer-generator's net kilowatt-hour consumption over that same period. The
compensation owed for the eligible customer-generator's net monthly
kilowatt-hour consumption shall be calculated at the retail rate of the rate
class the customer is normally assigned to. [L 2001, c 272, pt of §6; am L
2005, c 104, §7]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next